src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.aff
SFX B 0 r io # passif infectum personnel indicatif présent
SFX B 0 rque io 
SFX B 0 rne io 
SFX B 0 rve io 
SFX B io eris io 
SFX B io erisque io 
SFX B io erisne io 
SFX B io erisve io 
SFX B io itur io 
SFX B io iturque io 
SFX B io iturne io 
SFX B io iturve io 
SFX B io imur io 
SFX B io imurque io 
SFX B io imurne io 
SFX B io imurve io 
SFX B io imini io 
SFX B io iminique io 
SFX B io iminine io 
SFX B io iminive io 
SFX B io iuntur io 
SFX B io iunturque io 
SFX B io iunturne io 
SFX B io iunturve io 
SFX B o ebar io # passif infectum personnel indicatif imparfait
SFX B o ebarque io 
SFX B o ebarne io 
SFX B o ebarve io 
SFX B o ebaris io 
SFX B o ebarisque io 
SFX B o ebarisne io 
SFX B o ebarisve io 
SFX B o ebatur io 
SFX B o ebaturque io 
SFX B o ebaturne io 
SFX B o ebaturve io 
SFX B o ebamur io 
SFX B o ebamurque io 
SFX B o ebamurne io 
SFX B o ebamurve io 
SFX B o ebamini io 
SFX B o ebaminique io 
SFX B o ebaminine io 
SFX B o ebaminive io 
SFX B o ebantur io 
SFX B o ebanturque io 
SFX B o ebanturne io 
SFX B o ebanturve io 
SFX B o ar io # passif infectum personnel indicatif futur
SFX B o arque io 
SFX B o arne io 
SFX B o arve io 
SFX B o eris io 
SFX B o erisque io 
SFX B o erisne io 
SFX B o erisve io 
SFX B o etur io 
SFX B o eturque io 
SFX B o eturne io 
SFX B o eturve io 
SFX B o emur io 
SFX B o emurque io 
SFX B o emurne io 
SFX B o emurve io 
SFX B o emini io 
SFX B o eminique io 
SFX B o eminine io 
SFX B o eminive io 
SFX B o entur io 
SFX B o enturque io 
SFX B o enturne io 
SFX B o enturve io 
SFX B o ar io # passif infectum personnel subjonctif présent
SFX B o arque io 
SFX B o arne io 
SFX B o arve io 
SFX B o aris io 
SFX B o arisque io 
SFX B o arisne io 
SFX B o arisve io 
SFX B o atur io 
SFX B o aturque io 
SFX B o aturne io 
SFX B o aturve io 
SFX B o amur io 
SFX B o amurque io 
SFX B o amurne io 
SFX B o amurve io 
SFX B o amini io 
SFX B o aminique io 
SFX B o aminine io 
SFX B o aminive io 
SFX B o antur io 
SFX B o anturque io 
SFX B o anturne io 
SFX B o anturve io 
SFX B io erer io # passif infectum personnel subjonctif imparfait
SFX B io ererque io 
SFX B io ererne io 
SFX B io ererve io 
SFX B io ereris io 
SFX B io ererisque io 
SFX B io ererisne io 
SFX B io ererisve io 
SFX B io eretur io 
SFX B io ereturque io 
SFX B io ereturne io 
SFX B io ereturve io 
SFX B io eremur io 
SFX B io eremurque io 
SFX B io eremurne io 
SFX B io eremurve io 
SFX B io eremini io 
SFX B io ereminique io 
SFX B io ereminine io 
SFX B io ereminive io 
SFX B io erentur io 
SFX B io erenturque io 
SFX B io erenturne io 
SFX B io erenturve io 
SFX B io ere io # imperatif passif
SFX B io ereque io 
SFX B io erene io 
SFX B io ereve io 
SFX B io imini io 
SFX B io iminique io 
SFX B io iminine io 
SFX B io iminive io 
SFX B io i io # passif infectum impersonnel infinitif
SFX B io ique io 
SFX B io ine io 
SFX B io ive io 
SFX B o endus io # adjectif verbal
SFX B o endusque io 
SFX B o endusne io 
SFX B o endusve io 
SFX B o ende io 
SFX B o endeque io 
SFX B o endene io 
SFX B o endeve io 
SFX B o endum io 
SFX B o endumque io 
SFX B o endumne io 
SFX B o endumve io 
SFX B o endi io 
SFX B o endique io 
SFX B o endine io 
SFX B o endive io 
SFX B o endo io 
SFX B o endoque io 
SFX B o endone io 
SFX B o endove io 
SFX B o enda io 
SFX B o endaque io 
SFX B o endane io 
SFX B o endave io 
SFX B o endam io 
SFX B o endamque io 
SFX B o endamne io 
SFX B o endamve io 
SFX B o endae io 
SFX B o endaeque io 
SFX B o endaene io 
SFX B o endaeve io 
SFX B o endos io 
SFX B o endosque io 
SFX B o endosne io 
SFX B o endosve io 
SFX B o endorum io 
SFX B o endorumque io 
SFX B o endorumne io 
SFX B o endorumve io 
SFX B o endis io 
SFX B o endisque io 
SFX B o endisne io 
SFX B o endisve io 
SFX B o endas io 
SFX B o endasque io 
SFX B o endasne io 
SFX B o endasve io 
SFX B o endarum io 
SFX B o endarumque io 
SFX B o endarumne io 
SFX B o endarumve io 
SFX B ior ior ior 
SFX B ior eris ior # infectum personnel indicatif présent
SFX B ior erisque ior 
SFX B ior erisne ior 
SFX B ior erisve ior 
SFX B ior itur ior 
SFX B ior iturque ior 
SFX B ior iturne ior 
SFX B ior iturve ior 
SFX B ior imur ior 
SFX B ior imurque ior 
SFX B ior imurne ior 
SFX B ior imurve ior 
SFX B ior imini ior 
SFX B ior iminique ior 
SFX B ior iminine ior 
SFX B ior iminive ior 
SFX B ior iuntur ior 
SFX B ior iunturque ior 
SFX B ior iunturne ior 
SFX B ior iunturve ior 
SFX B ior iebar ior # infectum personnel indicatif imparfait
SFX B ior iebarque ior 
SFX B ior iebarne ior 
SFX B ior iebarve ior 
SFX B ior iebaris ior 
SFX B ior iebarisque ior 
SFX B ior iebarisne ior 
SFX B ior iebarisve ior 
SFX B ior iebatur ior 
SFX B ior iebaturque ior 
SFX B ior iebaturne ior 
SFX B ior iebaturve ior 
SFX B ior iebamur ior 
SFX B ior iebamurque ior 
SFX B ior iebamurne ior 
SFX B ior iebamurve ior 
SFX B ior iebamini ior 
SFX B ior iebaminique ior 
SFX B ior iebaminine ior 
SFX B ior iebaminive ior 
SFX B ior iebantur ior 
SFX B ior iebanturque ior 
SFX B ior iebanturne ior 
SFX B ior iebanturve ior 
SFX B ior iar ior # infectum personnel indicatif futur
SFX B ior iarque ior 
SFX B ior iarne ior 
SFX B ior iarve ior 
SFX B ior ieris ior 
SFX B ior ierisque ior 
SFX B ior ierisne ior 
SFX B ior ierisve ior 
SFX B ior ietur ior 
SFX B ior ieturque ior 
SFX B ior ieturne ior 
SFX B ior ieturve ior 
SFX B ior iemur ior 
SFX B ior iemurque ior 
SFX B ior iemurne ior 
SFX B ior iemurve ior 
SFX B ior iemini ior 
SFX B ior ieminique ior 
SFX B ior ieminine ior 
SFX B ior ieminive ior 
SFX B ior ientur ior 
SFX B ior ienturque ior 
SFX B ior ienturne ior 
SFX B ior ienturve ior 
SFX B ior iar ior # infectum personnel subjonctif présent
SFX B ior iarque ior 
SFX B ior iarne ior 
SFX B ior iarve ior 
SFX B ior iaris ior 
SFX B ior iarisque ior 
SFX B ior iarisne ior 
SFX B ior iarisve ior 
SFX B ior iatur ior 
SFX B ior iaturque ior 
SFX B ior iaturne ior 
SFX B ior iaturve ior 
SFX B ior iamur ior 
SFX B ior iamurque ior 
SFX B ior iamurne ior 
SFX B ior iamurve ior 
SFX B ior iamini ior 
SFX B ior iaminique ior 
SFX B ior iaminine ior 
SFX B ior iaminive ior 
SFX B ior iantur ior 
SFX B ior ianturque ior 
SFX B ior ianturne ior 
SFX B ior ianturve ior 
SFX B ior erer ior # infectum personnel subjonctif imparfait
SFX B ior ererque ior 
SFX B ior ererne ior 
SFX B ior ererve ior 
SFX B ior eris ior 
SFX B ior erisque ior 
SFX B ior erisne ior 
SFX B ior erisve ior 
SFX B ior eremur ior 
SFX B ior eremurque ior 
SFX B ior eremurne ior 
SFX B ior eremurve ior 
SFX B ior eremini ior 
SFX B ior ereminique ior 
SFX B ior ereminine ior 
SFX B ior ereminive ior 
SFX B ior erentur ior 
SFX B ior erenturque ior 
SFX B ior erenturne ior 
SFX B ior erenturve ior 
SFX B ior ere ior # infectum personnel impératif présent
SFX B ior ereque ior 
SFX B ior erene ior 
SFX B ior ereve ior 
SFX B ior i ior # infectum impersonnel infinitif présent
SFX B ior ique ior 
SFX B ior ine ior 
SFX B ior ive ior 
SFX B or endum ior # gérondif
SFX B or endumque ior 
SFX B or endumne ior 
SFX B or endumve ior 
SFX B or endi ior 
SFX B or endique ior 
SFX B or endine ior 
SFX B or endive ior 
SFX B or endo ior 
SFX B or endoque ior 
SFX B or endone ior 
SFX B or endove ior 
SFX B or ens ior # participe présent actif
SFX B or ensque ior 
SFX B or ensne ior 
SFX B or ensve ior 
SFX B or entem ior 
SFX B or entemque ior 
SFX B or entemne ior 
SFX B or entemve ior 
SFX B or entis ior 
SFX B or entisque ior 
SFX B or entisne ior 
SFX B or entisve ior 
SFX B or enti ior 
SFX B or entique ior 
SFX B or entine ior 
SFX B or entive ior 
SFX B or ente ior 
SFX B or enteque ior 
SFX B or entene ior 
SFX B or enteve ior 
SFX B or entes ior 
SFX B or entesque ior 
SFX B or entesne ior 
SFX B or entesve ior 
SFX B or entium ior 
SFX B or entiumque ior 
SFX B or entiumne ior 
SFX B or entiumve ior 
SFX B or entibus ior 
SFX B or entibusque ior 
SFX B or entibusne ior 
SFX B or entibusve ior 
SFX B or entia ior 
