src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
abhorreo/B
ambigo/B
amoveo/B
annecto/B
antecedo/B
appareo/B
appeto/B
appono/B
arceo/B
arefacio/B
arrideo/B
ascendo/B
aspergo/B
assero/B
assoleo/B
assumo/B
attendo/B
attingo/B
attraho/B
attulo/B
augeo/B
calleo/B
cano/B
capio/B
carpo/B
cedo/B
cerno/B
circumago/B
circumflecto/B
circumpono/B
circumsepio/B
circumvolvo/B
claresco/B
coalesco/B
coassumo/B
cognosco/B
cohaereo/B
coincido/B
collido/B
comburo/B
comminuo/B
commoveo/B
competo/B
compleo/B
compono/B
comprendo/B
concalefacio/B
concido/B
concludo/B
condescendo/B
conduco/B
conficio/B
configo/B
confligo/B
confundo/B
congredior/B
conicio/B
coniungo/B
conprehendo/B
conscribo/B
consisto/B
constituo/B
consuesco/B
consumo/B
consurgo/B
contendo/B
contexo/B
contingo/B
contraho/B
contranitor/B
contrapono/B
converto/B
convolvo/B
correspondeo/B
corripio/B
corrumpo/B
credo/B
cudo/B
curro/B
decedo/B
decerpo/B
decresco/B
decurro/B
deficio/B
defluo/B
delabor/B
delitesco/B
deminuo/B
demo/B
dependo/B
deprehendo/B
deprimo/B
descendo/B
desero/B
desisto/B
destruo/B
detego/B
detraho/B
devolvo/B
digero/B
digredior/B
diminuo/B
dimoveo/B
dirimo/B
discerno/B
disco/B
discutio/B
dispello/B
dispicio/B
dissero/B
distinguo/B
distribuo/B
divido/B
doleo/B
edo/Bq
efficio/B
effluo/B
egeo/B
eiicio/B
elicio/B
eligo/B
emergo/B
emitto/B
enitor/B
eripio/B
erumpo/B
evanesco/B
evolvo/B
excedo/B
excerpo/B
excipio/B
excresco/B
excutio/B
exerceo/B
exigo/B
existo/B
expendo/B
expleo/B
expono/B
exprimo/B
expuo/B
exsisto/B
extergeo/B
extraho/B
exurgo/B
facio/B
fateor/B
findo/B
flavesco/B
fleo/B
frango/B
fulgeo/B
gaudeo/B
gero/B
gradior/B
hisco/B
iaceo/B
icio/B
ignesco/B
illabor/B
illuceo/B
imbibo/B
immineo/B
impello/B
impermisceo/B
impleo/B
imprimo/B
incendo/B
incipio/B
incumbo/B
incutio/B
indo/B
induo/B
inflecto/B
infudo/B
ingigno/B
inhaereo/B
iniicio/B
innotesco/B
inquiro/B
insculpo/B
insideo/B
inspicio/B
insto/B
intego/B
intelligo/B
intercedo/B
intercipio/B
interiaceo/B
interiicio/B
intermisceo/B
internosco/B
interscribo/B
intervenio/B
intremisco/B
intrudo/B
invado/B
involvo/B
iubeo/B
labasco/B
lacesso/B
lateo/B
liqueo/B
lucrifacio/B
madeo/B
maneo/B
mereo/B
minuo/B
mitto/B
moveo/B
nascor/B
neglego/B
nitor/B
nosco/B
obiicio/B
obruo/B
obsisto/B
obtineo/B
occido/B
occulo/B
offendo/B
omitto/B
ostendo/B
pareo/B
parvipendo/B
patesco/B
pello/B
pendo/B
percipio/B
percutio/B
perdo/B
perficio/B
perhibeo/B
permaneo/B
perpendo/B
persisto/B
perstrepo/B
persuadeo/B
pertraho/B
peto/B
placeo/B
polleo/B
pono/B
posco/B
posthabeo/B
praebeo/B
praecino/B
praeexisto/B
praehendo/B
praepono/B
praescribo/B
praeterlabor/B
prehendo/B
procedo/B
procudo/B
prodo/B
proficio/B
profluo/B
progigno/B
prohibeo/B
promereo/B
promitto/B
promoveo/B
propono/B
prosequor/B
protraho/B
provideo/B
quaero/B
queror/B
rapio/B
recedo/B
recido/B
recognosco/B
recolo/B
reddo/B
reduco/B
refluo/B
refugio/B
rego/B
reiicio/B
remaneo/B
removeo/B
repello/B
repeto/B
repo/B
reprehendo/B
rescribo/B
resido/B
respicio/B
respuo/B
restringo/B
retrocedo/B
reverto/B
revivisco/B
revolvo/B
rigesco/B
rumpo/B
satago/B
scando/B
scribo/B
secerno/B
sedeo/B
seligo/B
sino/B
soleo/B
spargo/B
statuo/B
stringo/B
stupeo/B
subiaceo/B
subiungo/B
subsecui/B
subsido/B
subtaceo/B
subtexo/B
succedo/B
succenseo/B
suesco/B
sumo/B
superiaceo/B
supertexo/B
suppleo/B
surgo/B
suspendo/B
sustineo/B
taceo/B
tego/B
teneo/B
tero/B
trado/B
traho/B
transcribo/B
transpareo/B
transveho/B
tremo/B
tueor/B
urgeo/B
vado/B
veho/B
vergo/B
video/B
vireo/B
vivo/B
